Utah statutes.
11-13-223.   Open and public meetings.

(1)  To the extent that an interlocal entity is subject to or elects, by formal resolution of its governing body to comply with the provisions of Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act, it may for purposes of complying with those provisions:

(a)  convene and conduct any public meeting by means of a telephonic or telecommunications conference; and

(b)  give public notice of its meeting pursuant to Section 52-4-202.

(2)  In order to convene and conduct a public meeting by means of a telephonic or telecommunications conference, each interlocal entity shall if it is subject to or elects by formal resolution of its governing body to comply with Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act:

(a)  in addition to giving public notice required by Subsection (1) provide:

(i)  notice of the telephonic or telecommunications conference to the members of the governing body at least 24 hours before the meeting so that they may participate in and be counted as present for all purposes, including the determination that a quorum is present; and

(ii)  a description of how the members will be connected to the telephonic or telecommunications conference;

(b)  establish written procedures governing the conduct of any meeting at which one or more members of the governing body are participating by means of a telephonic or telecommunications conference;

(c)  provide for an anchor location for the public meeting at the principal office of the governing body; and

(d)  provide space and facilities for the physical attendance and participation of interested persons and the public at the anchor location, including providing for interested persons and the public to hear by speaker or other equipment all discussions and deliberations of those members of the governing body participating in the meeting by means of telephonic or telecommunications conference.

(3)  Compliance with the provisions of this section by a governing body constitutes full and complete compliance by the governing body with the corresponding provisions of Sections 52-4-201 and 52-4-202, to the extent that those sections are applicable to the governing body.

